Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.105

Court administrator.

There shall be a court administrator of the municipal court appointed by the judges of the municipal court, subject to confirmation by a majority of the legislative body of the city, and removable by the judges of the municipal court subject to like confirmation. Before entering upon the duties of his or her office the court administrator shall take and subscribe an oath the same as required for officers of the city, and shall execute a penal bond in such sum and with such sureties as the legislative body of the city may direct and subject to their approval, conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties, and that he or she will pay over to the treasurer of said city all moneys belonging to the city which shall come into his or her hands as such court administrator. The court administrator shall be paid such compensation as the legislative body of the city may deem reasonable. The court administrator shall act under the supervision and control of the presiding judge of the municipal court and shall supervise the functions of the chief clerk and director of the traffic violations bureau or similar agency of the city, and perform such other duties as may be assigned to him or her by the presiding judge of the municipal court.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2034; 1969 ex.s. c 147 s 2.]